Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 5. Licensing Generally

§ 28.2-225.
Fishing license required; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to fish in the tidal waters of the Commonwealth or those waters under the joint jurisdiction of the Commonwealth without first obtaining the required license, subject to the exemptions set out in §

28.2-226

.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-42, 28-43, 28-61, 28-66; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-47, 28.1-48, 28.1-59, 28.1-64; 1966, cc. 684, 695; 1968, c. 748; 1972, c. 833; 1973, c. 21; 1974, c. 313; 1976, c. 392; 1978, cc. 347, 358; 1979, c. 274; 1980, c. 605; 1981, cc. 61, 525; 1982, c. 461; 1983, c. 307; 1988, c. 710; 1990, c. 445; 1992, cc. 493, 503, 836, 895.

Cross references.

As to fishing in Pocomoke Sound and Tangier Sound, see §

28.2-524

.

As to fishing in Chesapeake Bay immediately west of Tangier Island, see §

28.2-525

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Inland waters. —

An Indian who habitually resides on an Indian reservation or an Indian that is a member of a Virginia recognized tribe
who resides in the Commonwealth is not required to obtain a license to fish in Virginia’s inland waters, or to hunt or trap in Virginia. Members of the Virginia tribes that were parties to the Treaty of 1677 with England are not required to obtain a license to fish or oyster in Virginia’s tidal waters provided the activity is limited to harvesting for sustenance. Virginia Indians are bound by the trapping, hunting and fishing laws and regulations of the Commonwealth regardless of whether they are on or off a reservation. See opinion of Attorney General to Robert W. Duncan, Executive Director, Virginia Department of Game & Inland Fisheries, and Jack G. Travelstead, Commissioner, Virginia Marine Resources Commission, 12-044, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 59 (7/19/13).

§ 28.2-226.
Exemptions from licensing requirements.

The following activities are exempt from the licensing requirements of this subtitle:

Except as otherwise provided by regulation, taking by dip net, hand line, or two crab pots, as much as one bushel of hard crabs and two dozen peeler crabs in any one day for personal use only.

Taking a maximum of one bushel of oysters in any one day for personal use, when taken by hand or with ordinary tongs during the legally prescribed oyster season on public oyster grounds open for harvest or unleased bottom open for harvest.

Taking a maximum of 250 clams in any one day for personal use, when taken by hand or with ordinary tongs.

Using one tank or float no greater than four feet in width and eight feet in length for shedding crabs for personal use.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-80, 28-137, 28-170, 28-177; 1954, c. 368; 1956, c. 293; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-78, 28.1-120, 28.1-165, 28.1-174; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1968, c. 785; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1983, cc. 307, 603; 1985, c. 180; 1988, c. 75; 1990, c. 154; 1991, c. 285; 1992, c. 836; 1993, c. 11; 2001, c. 51; 2013, c. 38; 2016, c. 7.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 51 inserted “Except as otherwise provided by regulation” in subdivision 1 of subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 deleted the subsection A designator and subsection B which read “No license shall be required of an oyster grounds leaseholder, or other person authorized or employed by a leaseholder, to harvest oysters or clams from the leasehold. However, this exemption shall not apply to other requirements to obtain permits, including those permits for dredging or scraping on leaseholds provided in §

28.2-516

, or for removal and transportation of shellfish from condemned areas as required by §§

28.2-810

and

28.2-811

.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 7 added “during the legally prescribed oyster season on public oyster grounds open for harvest or unleased bottom open for harvest” in subdivision 2.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2.

§ 28.2-226.1.
Recreational gear license required.

Any person desiring to take or catch finfish or shellfish for recreational purposes in the tidal waters of the Commonwealth using commercial gear authorized under §

28.2-226.2

shall first obtain the appropriate commercial gear license for recreational purposes. A license to use such gear for recreational purposes shall be issued to an individual for his exclusive use and shall not be transferable.

All gear licenses issued for recreational purposes shall be so marked.

Any person who has obtained a commercial gear license for recreational purposes only shall be exempt from the commercial fishing registration requirements of §§

28.2-241

and

28.2-242

.

For purposes of this section and §§

28.2-226.2

and

28.2-232

, “recreational purposes” means finfish or shellfish taken for personal use and not sold, traded, bartered, or given to another in order to be sold, traded, or bartered.

Holders of licenses under this section shall report catch and other data as is deemed necessary by the Commission for effective fisheries management.

Any person who engages in an activity for which an exemption is provided in §

28.2-226

, holds a saltwater recreational fishing license and uses a gear type listed in §

28.2-302.1

, or is exempt from the requirements of obtaining a saltwater recreational license pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

28.2-302.5

shall be exempt from the requirement of obtaining a commercial gear license for recreational purposes.

History.

1993, c. 219; 2005, c. 124; 2015, c. 468; 2018, c. 118.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 124 inserted “or included in §

28.2-302.1

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 468 substituted “§§

28.2-226.2

and

28.2-232

” for “§

28.2-226.2

” in subsection D.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 118, in subsection A, deleted “and for which an exemption is not provided §

28.2-226

, or included in §

28.2-302.1

” preceding “shall first obtain”; and added subsection F.

§ 28.2-226.2.
Commission to establish requirements for commercial gear licenses used for recreational purposes.

The Commission is authorized to establish the type and amount of commercial gear that can be used for taking finfish and shellfish for recreational purposes. The license fees for use of recreational gear shall be the same as fees charged for the particular gear when used commercially.

The Commission shall not issue to any licensee a recreational gear license that exceeds the following limitations:

One gill net up to 300 feet in length, $7.50;

Up to 10 crab pots with turtle excluder devices, $36; up to 10 crab pots without turtle excluder devices, $46;

One crab trap or crab pound, $5;

One crab scrape, $16; or

Two eel pots, $10.

All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Virginia Marine Products Fund as established under § 3.2-2705.

The Commission may subsequently revise the cost of licenses pursuant to §

28.2-201

.

History.

1993, c. 219; 2001, c. 28; 2009, c. 9; 2016, c. 136.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.2 references were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to the title revision by Acts 2008, c. 860, effective October 1, 2008.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 28, in subsection B, deleted “or” from the end of subdivision 3, added “or” at the end of subdivision 4, and added subdivision 5.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 136, in subsections A and B, substituted “that” for “which”; and in subdivision B 2, substituted “with turtle excluder devices, $36; up to 10 crab pots without turtle excluder devices, $46” for “$29.”

§ 28.2-227.
Special nonresident harvester’s license; fee and oath; revocation; penalty.

Any nonresident desiring to take or catch marine fish, crabs or any other seafood, except oysters, clams or other mollusks, from the tidal waters of the Commonwealth for which a license is required shall pay to any officer or agent a fee for a nonresident harvester’s license. The fee, to be established by the Commission, shall be no less than $350 or more than $1,150 or as subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

. Three hundred fifty dollars of each fee shall be credited to the Virginia Marine Products Fund as provided under § 3.2-2705. The remainder of the fee shall be credited to the Marine Fishing Improvement Fund, as established pursuant to §

28.2-208

.

The license shall be required of each boat used in Virginia’s tidal waters and shall be in addition to any other licenses required for the activity involved.

The nonresident shall state under oath his true name and address, the name and number of the boat being licensed, and that he will not violate any of the laws of the Commonwealth governing the taking and catching of seafood.

A nonresident harvester’s license shall be required prior to the purchase of any other license for the harvesting of seafood. Revocation of this license in accordance with §

28.2-232

shall constitute revocation of any other license held by the nonresident under the provisions of this subtitle. No commercial fishing license or permit shall be sold to a nonresident whose state of residence does not offer for sale the same or substantially similar license or permit to a resident of the Commonwealth.

Any Virginia resident who enters into a partnership or other agreement with the intent to defeat the object of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1983, c. 299, § 28.1-47.1; 1991, c. 411; 1992, c. 836; 1993, c. 245; 1994, c. 155; 2009, c. 9; 2010, cc. 12, 144.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

” at the end of the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 12 and 144 are nearly identical, and added the last sentence in subsection D.

§ 28.2-228.
Licenses for purchase of fish, shellfish, or marine organisms from the catcher; fee.

Any person purchasing from the catcher clams, crabs, fish, or other seafood, except oysters, caught from the waters of the Commonwealth or the Potomac River, shall pay a license fee of (i) $50 for each place of business and (ii) $25 for each boat or motor vehicle used for buying. The Commission may subsequently revise the cost of licenses pursuant to §

28.2-201

.

Any person purchasing from the catcher oysters caught from the public grounds of the Commonwealth or the Potomac River shall pay a license fee of (i) $50 for a single place of business with one boat or motor vehicle used for buying oysters and (ii) $100 for a single place of business with multiple boats or motor vehicles used for buying oysters. The Commission may subsequently revise the cost of licenses pursuant to §

28.2-201

.

No license shall be required of any person purchasing seafood for personal consumption, any place of business which is solely a restaurant, or any person who operates a business which is subject to local license taxes under §

58.1-3703

and who has in his possession no more than one bushel of peeler crabs to be sold as bait.

History.

1970, c. 726, § 28.1-119.1; 1979, c. 274; 1980, c. 218; 1984, c. 316; 1988, c. 27; 1992, c. 836; 2009, c. 9; 2013, c. 38.

Cross references.

As to exceptions to the reasonable suspicion requirement to stop, board, or inspect a noncommercial vessel on navigable waters of the Commonwealth, see §

19.2-10.3

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 substituted “person purchasing from the catcher clams, crabs, fish, or other seafood, except oysters, caught” for “person, purchasing from the catcher, oysters or clams caught from the public grounds of the Commonwealth or the Potomac River, or crabs, fish, or other seafood, caught” in subsection A, added subsection B, and redesignated former subsection B as C, and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 28.2-228.1.
Seafood landing licenses.

The Commission may by regulation establish licenses for the landing of seafood in Virginia, the fee for which shall not exceed $150 or as subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

. The regulations may limit the number of such licenses that may be issued and may establish eligibility criteria. Fees collected from the sale of seafood landing licenses shall be deposited to the Marine Fishing Improvement Fund established in §

28.2-208

.

The Commission may grant exceptions to the license requirement established in subsection A to any person registered as a commercial fisherman under the provisions of §

28.2-241

.

The following shall be Class 3 misdemeanors: (i) landing seafood without the license that may be required under this section and (ii) failure to produce or have available for inspection the license that may be required under this section when requested by any officer. Failure to produce the license is prima facie evidence that the person is landing seafood without a license.

History.

1996, c. 214; 2009, c. 9.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A.

§ 28.2-229.
When licenses terminate; proration and refund not permitted.

The Commission shall issue all licenses on an annual basis. All licenses shall be valid from January 1 of each year or their later date of purchase and expire on December 31 of the year in which issued.

Refunds shall not be made or prorated if the fishing effort is reduced, or seasons are closed (i) in order to promote conservation of the fisheries or (ii) due to natural conditions. Refunds shall not be made for any license that is suspended or revoked. However, if the license is no longer for sale due to fisheries management purposes, refunds shall be made to the license holder on a prorated basis.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-10.1, 28-61, 28-71; 1952, c. 653; 1954, c. 179; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-21, 28.1-59, 28.1-70; 1966, c. 695; 1974, cc. 85, 313; 1978, cc. 347, 358; 1979, cc. 18, 274; 1980, c. 605; 1982, c. 461; 1983, c. 299, §§ 28.1-47, 28.1-47.1; 1988, c. 710; 1991, c. 411; 1992, c. 836; 2009, c. 384.

Cross references.

As to fishing in Pocomoke Sound and Tangier Sound, see §

28.2-524

.

As to fishing in Chesapeake Bay immediately west of Tangier Island, see §

28.2-525

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 384 added the last sentence in subsection B.

§ 28.2-230.
Penalty for false statements or altering a fishing license; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to (i) subscribe to a materially false statement in applying to secure a license to fish or (ii) alter or change such license.

A violation of this section shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-66; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-64; 1981, c. 525; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-231.
Exhibition of license; display to officers; penalty.

Any person engaged in fishing shall have the required license available for inspection and shall present such license when requested by an officer. Failure to present the license upon request of any officer is a Class 1 misdemeanor and prima facie evidence that the person is fishing without a license.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-137, 28-157; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-120, 28.1-133; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1991, c. 285; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to exceptions to the reasonable suspicion requirement to stop, board, or inspect a noncommercial vessel on navigable waters of the Commonwealth, see §

19.2-10.3

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-232.
Revocation of licenses.

The Commission may revoke the fishing privileges within the Commonwealth’s tidal waters and revoke or prohibit the issuance, reissuance, or renewal of any licenses if, after a hearing held after 10 days’ notice to the applicant or licensee, it finds that the person has violated any provision of this subtitle. The Commission shall not revoke any license other than the license for the fishery in which the violation occurred. The Commission may revoke licenses other than the applicable license upon a second or subsequent violation within five years.

The duration of the license revocation and prohibition shall be fixed by the Commission up to a maximum of five years, taking into account (i) evidence of repeated violations of the conservation, health, or safety laws and regulations; (ii) abusive conduct and behavior toward officers; and (iii) the damage that has occurred, or might have occurred, to the natural resources, the public health, or the seafood industry.In determining whether to revoke a person’s tidal fishing privileges for up to a maximum of five years, the Commission shall take into account (i) evidence of habitual disregard for the conservation, health, or safety laws and regulations; (ii) whether the violation of this subtitle was committed while the person’s licenses or privileges were revoked or while the person was under a Commission-ordered probation period; and (iii) evidence that significant harm occurred, or might have occurred, to the natural resources, the public health, or the seafood industry.

The Commission may assess a civil penalty of up to $10,000 against a person if it finds, after a hearing held after 10 days’ notice, that the person has engaged in fishing, other than for recreational purposes as defined in §

28.2-226.1

, while the person’s applicable licenses or fishing privileges have been revoked pursuant to this section or §

28.2-528

. In setting the amount of the civil penalty, the Commission shall consider the person’s history of violating the conservation, health, and safety laws and regulations of the Commonwealth. The Commission shall accept payment of the civil penalty by credit card and may collect such actual credit card service charges as apply.

If the person fails to pay the civil penalty within 180 days of the assessment of the civil penalty by the Commission, the Commissioner may transmit a true copy of the order assessing such civil penalty to the clerk of the court of any county or city wherein it is ascertained that the person owing the penalty has any estate, and the clerk to whom such copy is so sent shall record it, as a judgment is required by law to be recorded, and shall index the same as well in the name of the Commonwealth as of the person owing the penalty, and thereupon there shall be a lien in favor of the Commonwealth on the property of the person within such county or city in the amount of the civil penalty.

Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Virginia Marine Products Fund established in § 3.2-2705.An appeal from the Commission’s decision may be taken to the courts as provided in Article 3 (§

28.2-216

et seq.).

History.

1962, c. 406, § 28.1-36; 1970, c. 610; 1989, c. 2; 1992, c. 836; 2013, c. 50; 2015, c. 468; 2017, c. 630.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 50 substituted “the fishing privileges within the Commonwealth’s tidal waters and revoke” for “and” in the first paragraph and “with the withdrawal of all fishing privileges conferred by this title during that period” in the second paragraph, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 468 added subsection designations A and B and added subsections C through E; and in subsection B, substituted “up to a maximum of five years” for “up to a maximum of two years.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 630, added the last two sentences is subsection A; in subsection B, deleted “with the withdrawal of all fishing privileges conferred by this title during that period” following “maximum of five years,” substituted “violations of the” for “or habitual disregard for,” and “or” for “and” in clause (i), deleted “severity of any” preceding “damage that has” in clause (iii), and added the last paragraph; in subsection C, inserted “applicable” following “while the person’s,” substituted “or” for “and,” and added the last sentence; and in subsection E, deleted “of this chapter” following “(§

28.2-216

et seq.)” in the last paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Oysters, § 9.